District of Columbia statutes.
21-2402.08

Notice of proceeding.

If a petition for the appointment of a guardian or issuance of a protective order is brought in the District of Columbia and the District was not the respondent’s home state on the date the petition was filed, in addition to complying with the notice requirements of the District, notice of the petition shall be given to those persons who would be entitled to notice of the petition if a proceeding were brought in the respondent’s home state. The notice shall be given in the same manner as notice is required to be given in the District.

History

Nov. 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-270, § 2(b), 55 DCR 11018

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 208 of the Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act.